__1st_try_roman_lexica__/subr.lexc
!!!subr.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +Subr

LEXICON Root
Subr;

LEXICON SubrInf
+Subr:0 #;

LEXICON Subr
!Lexical items from corpus
agr	SubrInf;
wlw	SubrInf;
zyra	SubrInf;
angar	SubrInf;
čnanče	SubrInf;
lykn	SubrInf;
mgr	SubrInf;
ta	SubrInf;
erčnd	SubrInf;
če	SubrInf;
čra	SubrInf;
wŕt	SubrInf;
grče	SubrInf;
er_čnd	SubrInf;
čw	SubrInf;
blke	SubrInf;
bnabrayn	SubrInf;
ps	SubrInf;
y'ny	SubrInf;
čwn	SubrInf;
enwz	SubrInf;
wgrne	SubrInf;
w	SubrInf;
ke	SubrInf;
črake	SubrInf;
wŕty	SubrInf;
erče	SubrInf;
čra_ke	SubrInf;
wly	SubrInf;
agrče	SubrInf;
wala	SubrInf;
bs_ke	SubrInf;
ama	SubrInf;
